California statutes. Water Code
(a) The board of directors shall by resolution divide the district into as many divisions as there are directors and assign a number to each division. Such divisions shall be as nearly equal in population as practicable; provided, however, that if there is uninhabited land, which shall be defined as land having 12 or less registered voters residing therein in excess of 3,000 contiguous acres within any improvement district, such land may be designated by the board of directors as a division, and in such event elections for director for such division, which director need only be a holder of title to land within such division, shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 35000) of Chapter 1 and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 35100) of this part.

(b) After approving the election of directors by divisions, the board of directors shall by resolution, not less than 120 days prior to the next general district election, designate which divisions shall elect directors at that election to succeed the directors whose terms then expire. The remaining divisions shall elect directors at the general district election next following that election. 

(c) Each director elected by division shall be a resident of that division.

(d) The board of directors by resolution may, at any time after initially dividing the district into divisions, but not less than 120 days before a general district election, change the boundaries of the divisions to keep them as nearly equal in population as practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35191.

At the first general district election following January 1, 1981, the number of directors to be elected shall correspond with the number of directors whose terms expire. The directors whose terms have not expired shall serve their unexpired terms under the qualification to hold office that existed prior to January 1, 1981. In that first election, and in all subsequent elections, the form of the ballot and the conduct of the election shall be governed by the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) for resident voting elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 248.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35193.

The provisions of this chapter shall in no way invalidate any act of the district, its directors, or its officers and employees made or performed while the district was operating as a landowner voting district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35194.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect any acts or proceedings heretofore taken for the authorization, issuance, or sale of any bonds of the district in any manner provided by law prior to the effective date of this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter, “bonds” shall include notes and any other evidences of indebtedness of the district or any improvement district thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35195.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of directors may at any time alter, repeal, or amend the district’s bylaws by a majority vote. Any alteration, repeal, or amendment to the bylaws shall be recorded with the county recorder of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Method of Elections for the Borrego Water District [35200. - 35206.]

35200.

This chapter shall apply only to the manner in which elections are conducted in the Borrego Water District.

For the purposes of this chapter, “district” means the Borrego Water District. In all other respects, the district shall continue to be operated, managed, and governed as a California water district in accordance with this division and other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35201.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, or the bylaws of the district, all elections held after January 1, 1981, within the district shall be conducted as resident voter elections in accordance with this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require resident voter approval of bonds where voter approval is not required under the statutory or constitutional provisions in effect prior to January 1, 1981.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35202.

Qualified voters of the district shall be residents of, and registered voters in, the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35203.

All directors elected after January 1, 1981, shall be qualified voters of the district at the time of their election and during their term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35204.

Directors of the district shall be elected on a districtwide basis. Newly elected directors shall take office on the last Friday in November immediately following the general district election.

The term of office shall be for four years and each director shall hold office until his successor qualifies and takes office. The terms of office of directors shall continue to be staggered to keep as nearly equal as practicable the number of directors to be elected at each subsequent general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35205.

In order to facilitate an orderly transition to resident voter elections and to preserve staggered terms, the terms of office of directors serving on January 1, 1981, shall remain unchanged and no provision of this chapter shall be construed to disqualify any director serving on that date from continuing in office; provided, that any person appointed to fill a vacancy on the board of directors shall be a qualified voter of the district as provided in Section 35202.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35206.

This chapter shall in no way invalidate any act of the district or of its directors, officers, and employees made or performed while the district was operating as a landowner voter district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Method of Elections for the El Toro Water District [35210. - 35220.]

35210.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply only to the El Toro Water District. For purposes of this chapter, “district” means the El Toro Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

35211.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, or the bylaws of the district, all elections held after the effective date of this chapter within the district, including elections for director and elections which are required by law to authorize any special taxes or bonded indebtedness, shall be conducted as resident voter elections in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require resident voter approval of bonds where voter approval is not required under the statutory or constitutional provisions in effect prior to the effective date of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

35212.

Qualified voters within the district shall be residents of and registered voters in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

35213.

All directors elected after the effective date of this chapter shall be residents of the district and shall be registered at the time of their election and during their term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

35214.

Directors of the district shall be elected on an at-large basis unless the board of directors determines that directors shall be elected by divisions. The term “by divisions” as used in this chapter means the election of directors by voters of the division alone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

35215.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of directors may at any time establish divisions within the district in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. If the board of directors decides to establish divisions, the following shall apply:

(a) The board of directors shall by resolution divide the district into as many divisions as there are directors and assign a number to each division. Such divisions shall be as nearly equal in population as practicable.

(b) After approving the election of directors by divisions, the board of directors shall by resolution, not less than 120 days prior to the next general district election, designate which divisions shall elect directors at that election to succeed the directors whose terms then expire. The remaining divisions shall elect directors at the general district election next following that election. 

(c) Each director elected by division shall be a resident of that division.

(d) The board of directors by resolution may, at any time after initially dividing the district into divisions, but not less than 120 days before a general district election, change the boundaries of the divisions to keep them as nearly equal in population as practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

35216.

At the first general district election following the effective date of this chapter, the number of directors to be elected shall correspond with the number of directors whose terms expire. The directors whose terms have not expired shall serve their unexpired terms under the qualification to hold office that existed prior to the effective date of this chapter. In that first election and in all subsequent elections, the form of the ballot and the conduct of the election shall be governed by the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) for resident voting elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 249.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35218.

The provisions of this chapter shall in no way invalidate any act of the district, its directors, or its officers and employees made or performed while the district was operating as a landowner voting district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

35219.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect any acts or proceedings heretofore taken for the authorization, issuance, or sale of any bonds of the district in any manner provided by law prior to the effective date of this chapter or affect the ability of the district to sell and issue any bond heretofore authorized. For the purposes of this chapter, “bonds” shall include notes and any other evidences of indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

35220.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of directors may at any time alter, repeal, or amend the district’s bylaws by a majority vote. Any alteration, repeal, or amendment to the bylaws shall be recorded with the county recorder of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Method of Election for the Rancho California Water District [35230. - 35237.]

35230.

This chapter shall apply only to the manner in which elections are conducted in the Rancho California Water District. For the purposes of this chapter, “district” means the Rancho California Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35231.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, or the bylaws of the district, all district elections held after the transition period provided in Section 35232 shall be conducted as resident voter elections. Except as provided in this chapter, the district shall continue to be operated, managed, and governed as a California water district in accordance with this division and other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35232.

(a) In order to facilitate an orderly transition to resident voter elections, commencing with the 1991 district election, there shall be a transition period which shall continue until the entire board is elected by resident vote. At each election, during the transition period, one new director position shall convert to a resident voter position and, thereafter, shall remain a resident voter position, in accordance with the following:

(1) At the 1991 district election, one director shall be elected by resident voters and two directors shall be elected by landowner voters.

(2) At the 1993 district election, one director shall be elected by resident voters and three directors shall be elected by landowner voters.

(3) At the 1995 district election, two directors shall be elected by resident voters and one director shall be elected by landowner voters.

(4) At the 1997 district election, two directors shall be elected by resident voters and two directors shall be elected by landowner voters.

(5) At the 1999 district election, three directors shall be elected by resident voters.

(6) At the 2001 district election, three directors shall be elected by resident voters and one director shall be elected by landowner voters.

(b) Following the 2001 district election, subsequent district director elections shall be resident voter elections. The transition period shall conclude when the term of the last director elected by landowner voters ends in 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35233.

District elections shall be conducted in conformance with the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) and the laws generally applicable to districts created and operated pursuant to this division, except that during the transition period provided in Section 35232, the following shall apply:

(a) During the transition period, at district general elections, some directors shall be elected by resident voters while others shall be elected by landowner voters. Separate ballots shall be prepared and separate elections shall be conducted for those director positions which will be elected by resident voters and for those which will be elected by landowner voters. Notwithstanding Section 10555 of the Elections Code, these landowner voter elections and resident voter elections shall be conducted simultaneously.

(b) During the transition period, district elections shall continue, as presently authorized, to be conducted by all-mailed ballots pursuant to Section 4108 of the Elections Code. Following the transition period, the all-mailed ballot procedure may be revoked under the procedures of Section 4003 of the Elections Code or district elections may be consolidated with the statewide general election as provided by Section 10404 of the Elections Code.

(c) During the transition period, separate voter lists of resident voters and landowner voters eligible to vote within the district shall be prepared and maintained according to applicable provisions of law. Separate all-mailed ballot elections shall be held for the directors to be elected by resident voters and for those to be elected by landowner voters.

(d) During the transition period, district directors shall continue to be elected on an at-large basis. Following the transition period, the district board of directors may determine to establish director divisions in accordance with Section 35215.

(e) During the transition period, the district board of directors shall consist of seven directors. Following the transition period, the number of directors on the district board of directors may be changed in accordance with Sections 34708 and 34708.5.

(f) During the transition period, any district election held for the purpose of obtaining voter approval for bonded or other indebtedness shall be conducted as a landowner voter election. Following the transition period, any district election held for the purpose of obtaining voter approval for bonded or other indebtedness shall be conducted as a resident voter election.

(g) During the transition period, a person who qualifies according to Section 35234 both to be a director elected by resident voters and a director elected by landowner voters may run for the district board of directors on both the resident voter ballot and the landowner voter ballot on the same election date. In the event that the same person is elected to the district board on both ballots, the person shall be declared elected on the resident voter ballot and not elected on the landowner voter ballot. The candidate with the next highest number of votes on the landowner voter ballot shall be declared elected. If this procedure results in fewer remaining candidates than there are landowner voter director positions to be filled, then the unfilled positions shall be treated as vacant and filled according to subdivision (h).

(h) During the transition period, any vacancy on the district board shall be filled according to the procedures contained in Section 1780 of the Government Code. To be eligible to fill a vacancy, a person shall be qualified to be a director according to Section 35234 either as a director elected by resident voters if the person who vacated the position was elected by resident voters, or as a director elected by landowner voters if the person who vacated the position was elected by landowner voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 250.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35234.

All directors elected by resident voters shall be residents of, and registered voters in, the district at the time of their election and during their term of office. During the transition period, directors elected by landowner voters shall be qualified according to Section 34700 at the time of election and during their term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35235.

Only resident voters, registered to vote in the manner prescribed by law, shall be eligible to vote for district directors to be elected by resident voters. During the transition period, landowner voters qualified according to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 35000) shall be eligible to vote for district directors to be elected by landowner voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35236.

This chapter shall in no way invalidate any action of the district or of its directors, or officers, and employees made or performed while the district was operating as a landowner voting district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35237.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect any acts or proceedings previously taken for the authorization, issuance, or sale of any bonds of the district in any manner provided by law prior to the effective date of this chapter or affect the ability of the district to sell and issue any bond previously authorized. For the purposes of this chapter, “bonds” shall include notes and any other evidences of indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Method of Election for the Santa Margarita Water District [35240. - 35249.]

35240.

This chapter shall apply only to the Santa Margarita Water District. For purposes of this chapter, “district” means the Santa Margarita Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1047, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

35241.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, or the bylaws of the district, all elections within the district, including elections for director and elections that are required by law to authorize any special taxes or bonded indebtedness, shall be conducted as resident voter elections in accordance with this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require resident voter approval of bonds where voter approval is not required under the statutory or constitutional provisions in effect prior to January 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1047, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

35242.

Qualified voters within the district shall be residents of, and registered voters in, the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1047, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

35243.

All directors elected after January 1, 1994, shall be residents of the district and shall be registered at the time of their election and during their term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1047, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

35244.

Directors of the district shall be elected on an at-large basis unless the board of directors determines that directors shall be elected by divisions. The term “by divisions” as used in this chapter means the election of directors by voters of the division alone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1047, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

35245.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of directors may at any time establish divisions within the district in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. If the board of directors decides to establish divisions, all of the following shall apply:

(a) The board of directors shall, by resolution, divide the district into as many divisions as there are directors and assign a number to each division. Divisions shall be as nearly equal in population as practicable.

(b) After approving the election of directors by divisions, the board of directors shall, by resolution, not less than 120 days prior to the next general district election, designate which divisions shall elect directors at that election to succeed the directors whose terms then expire. The remaining divisions shall elect directors at the general district election next following that election.

(c) Each director elected by division shall be a resident of that division.

(d) The board of directors may, by resolution, at any time after initially dividing the district into divisions, but not less than 120 days before a general district election, change the boundaries of the divisions to keep them as nearly equal in population as practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1047, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

35246.

(a) At the first general district election following January 1, 1996, all directors shall be elected. The terms of office of those directors who are in office on January 1, 1996, shall be shortened and shall expire upon the election and qualification of their successors at that first general district election described in this subdivision. In that first district election and in all subsequent elections, except as specified in subdivision (b), the form of the ballot and the conduct of the election shall be governed by the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) for resident voting elections.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1304 of the Elections Code, the general district election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of every even-numbered year to choose a successor for each director whose term of office will expire on the following first Friday in December, and shall be consolidated with the statewide general election in accordance with Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

(c) Those directors whose four-year terms of office would, prior to the amendment of this section during the 1995–96 session of the Legislature, have expired on the first Friday in December of 1995 shall, instead, continue in their offices until not later than the fourth Tuesday after the day of the general district election held in 1996 pursuant to this section.

(d) Immediately following the general district election described in subdivision (a), the directors so elected at that election shall determine by lot as to those two directors who shall serve two-year terms and as to the three directors who shall serve four-year terms. Except as provided in this subdivision, all directors shall serve four-year terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 355, Sec. 1.   Effective August 4, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35247.

This chapter does not in any way invalidate any act of the district, its directors, or its officers and employees made or performed while the district was operating as a landowner voting district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1047, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

35248.

This chapter does not affect any acts or proceedings heretofore taken for the authorization, issuance, or sale of any bonds of the district in any manner provided by law prior to January 1, 1994, or affect the ability of the district to sell and issue any bond heretofore authorized. For the purposes of this chapter, “bonds” includes notes and any other evidences of indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1047, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

35249.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of directors may at any time alter, repeal, or amend the district’s bylaws by a majority vote. Any alteration, repeal, or amendment to the bylaws shall be recorded with the county recorder of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1047, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.3. Method of Election for the Riverview Water District [35252. - 35252.18.]

35252.

This chapter shall apply only to the Riverview Water District. For purposes of this chapter, “district” means the Riverview Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, or the bylaws of the district, all elections within the district, including elections for director and elections that are required by law to authorize any special taxes or bonded indebtedness, shall be conducted as resident voter elections in accordance with this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require resident voter approval of bonds where voter approval is not required under the statutory or constitutional provisions in effect prior to January 1, 1996.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.4.

Qualified voters within the district shall be residents of, and registered voters in, the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.6.

All directors elected after January 1, 1996, shall be residents of the district and shall be registered at the time of their election and during their term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.8.

Directors of the district shall be elected on an at-large basis unless the board of directors determines that directors shall be elected by divisions. The term “by divisions,” as used in this chapter, means the election of directors by voters of the division alone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.10.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of directors may at any time establish divisions within the district in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. If the board of directors decides to establish divisions, all of the following shall apply:

(a) The board of directors shall, by resolution, divide the district into as many divisions as there are directors and assign a number to each division. Divisions shall be as nearly equal in population as practicable.

(b) After approving the election of directors by divisions, the board of directors shall, by resolution, not less than 120 days prior to the next general district election, designate which divisions shall elect directors at that election to succeed the directors whose terms then expire. The remaining divisions shall elect directors at the general district election next following that election.

(c) Each director elected by division shall be a resident of that division.

(d) The board of directors may, by resolution, at any time after initially dividing the district into divisions, but not less than 120 days before a general district election, change the boundaries of the divisions to keep them as nearly equal in population as practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.12.

(a) The terms of office of the two directors who were elected in 1992, or the successor to any director elected in 1992, shall expire upon the election and qualification of their successors at the November 1996 general district election. The terms of office of the three directors who were elected in 1994, or the successor to any director elected in 1994, shall expire upon the election and qualification of their successors at the November 1998 general district election.

(b) The general district election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November in each even-numbered year to choose a successor for each director, the term of whose office will expire at noon on the first Friday in December following the general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.14.

This chapter does not in any way invalidate any act of the district, its directors, or its officers and employees made or performed while the district was operating as a landowner voting district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.16.

This chapter does not affect any acts or proceedings heretofore taken for the authorization, issuance, or sale of any bonds of the district in any manner provided by law prior to January 1, 1996, or affect the ability of the district to sell and issue any bond heretofore authorized. For the purposes of this chapter, “bonds” includes notes and any other evidences of indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.18.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of directors may at any time alter, repeal, or amend the district’s bylaws by a majority vote. Any alteration, repeal, or amendment to the bylaws shall be recorded with the county recorder of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Method of Elections for Ramirez Water District [35280. - 35288.]

35280.

This chapter shall apply only to the Ramirez Water District. For purposes of this chapter, “district” means the Ramirez Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 699, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35281.

The board of directors of the district may, by a four-fifths vote, at any time, establish two divisions, or later establish new boundaries for the two divisions, within the district in accordance with this chapter. If the board decides to establish divisions or new boundaries for established divisions, all of the following apply:

(a) (1) The board of directors shall by resolution divide the district into two divisions.

(2) Notwithstanding Sections 35026 and 35027, one division shall be comprised of approximately 60 percent of the acreage of the district and the other division shall be comprised of approximately 40 percent of the acreage of the district.

(b) The division comprised of approximately 40 percent of the acreage of the district shall have two directors. The division comprised of approximately 60 percent of the acreage of the district shall have three directors.

(c) Each director shall be a holder of title to land within the division represented by that director, or the legal representative of the holder of title to land within that division . If a corporation holds title to land, the president of the corporation may serve as a director, or the board of directors of the corporation may select other persons who may serve as directors if written notice is provided to the district.

(d) After approving the establishment of two divisions or establishment of new boundaries for the two divisions, the board shall, by resolution, not less than 120 days prior to the next general district election, designate which division shall elect directors at that election to succeed the directors whose terms then expire. The remaining division shall elect directors at the general district election next following that election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 156.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

35282.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the board to act by a four-fifths vote on any matter except as expressly provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 157.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

35283.

Except as provided in this chapter, all elections shall be governed by the general provisions of this division and by the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 699, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35284.

This chapter does not in any way invalidate any act of the district, its directors, or its officers and employees made or performed before the effective date of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 699, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35285.

(a) This chapter does not affect any acts or proceedings heretofore taken for the authorization, issuance, or sale of any bonds of the district before the effective date of this chapter or affect the ability of the district to sell and issue any bond heretofore authorized.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, “bonds” includes notes and any other evidences of indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 699, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35286.

The board of directors may at any time alter, repeal, or amend the district’s bylaws by a majority vote. Any alteration, repeal, or amendment to the bylaws shall be recorded with the county recorder of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 699, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35287.

No board action taken pursuant to this chapter shall require approval by the county board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 699, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35288.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 35281, the 1995 district election shall be by divisions established by the board of directors pursuant to this chapter if the board of directors establishes those divisions on or before September 9, 1995. Subsequent district elections shall be held pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 699, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. POWERS AND PURPOSES [35300. - 35886.]



  CHAPTER 1. By-Laws [35300. - 35307.]

35300.

A district shall adopt for the government and control of its affairs a code of by-laws consistent with the Constitution and laws of the State and the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35301.

Within 60 days after they have qualified for office, the board of directors elected at the formation election shall prepare the by-laws for the written approval of the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35302.

When the by-laws of a district are approved by the board of supervisors of the principal county, the board of directors shall adopt them by resolution entered in its minutes, unless prior to adoption by resolution by-laws are adopted and filed with the secretary by the written assent of the holders of title to a majoritiy in area of the land. The records of the United States Land Office for the district in which the land is situated, the records of the State Lands Commission, and the records in the office of the county recorder of each affected county are conclusive evidence of ownership for the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35303.

The bylaws shall provide for:

(a) The manner of voting in person or by proxy.

(b) The qualifications and duties of officers, the tenure of their office, and the time and manner of their appointment or election, insofar as not provided for in the Uniform District Election Law.

(c) The compensation of officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

35304.

The by-laws shall also provide for:

(a) The location of the district office.

(b) The method of changing the location of the office.

(c) The method of amending or repealing the by-laws.

(d) Suitable penalties for the violation of the by-laws not to exceed in any one case two hundred dollars ($200) for any one offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35305.

The by-laws may be repealed or amended or new by-laws adopted by the assent of two-thirds of the total vote of the district, given either in writing or by ballot cast at a district election.

The by-laws may also be amended by a four-fifths vote of the directors and approval of the board of supervisors of the principal county of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1676.)
-------------------------------------------

35306.
